Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201468-1107
Aging Nebraskans Task Force; created;
purpose; executive committee; members; duties; statewide strategic plan for
long-term care services; creation; consideration.

(1) The Aging Nebraskans Task Force is created.
The purpose of the task force is to develop and facilitate implementation
of a statewide strategic plan for addressing the needs of the aging population
in the state. The task force shall provide a forum for collaboration among
state, local, community, public, and private stakeholders in long-term care
programs.

(2)(a) The executive
committee of the task force shall include as voting members the chairperson
of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature, a member of
the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature appointed by the Executive
Board of the Legislative Council, a member of the Health and Human Services
Committee of the Legislature appointed by the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council, a member of the Legislature's Planning Committee appointed by the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council, and an at-large member appointed
by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council. The voting members of the
executive committee shall choose a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among
the voting members.

(b)
The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services
or his or her designee and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or his or
her designee shall be nonvoting, ex officio members of the executive committee
of the task force.

(c) The remaining four members of the task force shall be nonvoting
members appointed by the executive committee of the task force through an
application and selection process, representing stakeholders in the long-term
care system and may include a representative of the Division of Medicaid and
Long-Term Care Advisory Committee on Aging, representatives of health care
providers, elder law attorneys, representatives of the long-term care ombudsman
program, health care economists, geriatric specialists, family caregivers
of seniors in at-home care, providers of services to the elderly, seniors
currently or previously in institutional care, and aging advocacy organizations.

(3) The executive
committee of the task force shall advise the task force regarding the interaction
among the three branches of government related to long-term care programs
and services. The members of the executive committee shall each represent
his or her own branch of government, and no member of the executive committee
shall participate in actions that could be deemed to be the exercise of the
duties and prerogatives of another branch of government or that improperly
delegate the powers and duties of any branch of government to another branch
of government.

(4) The task force shall work with administrators of area agencies
on aging, nursing home and assisted-living residence providers, hospitals,
rehabilitation centers, managed care companies, senior citizen centers, community
stakeholders, advocates for elder services and programs, the Center for Public
Affairs Research of the College of Public Affairs and Community Service at
the University of Nebraska at Omaha, and seniors statewide to establish effective
community collaboration for informed decisionmaking that supports the provisions
of effective and efficient long-term care services.

(5) The task force shall
create a statewide strategic plan for long-term care services in Nebraska
which shall consider, but not be limited to:

(a) Promotion of independent
living through provision of long-term care services and support that enable
an individual to live in the setting of his or her choice;

(b) Provision
of leadership to support sound fiscal management of long-term care budgets
so that Nebraska will be able to meet the increasing demand for long-term
care services as a growing portion of the state's population reaches the age
of eighty years;

(c) Expedited creation of workforce development and training programs
specific to the needs of and in response to Nebraska's growing aging population;

(d) The identification
of gaps in the service delivery system that contribute to the inefficient
and ineffective delivery of services; and

(e) Development of a process for evaluating
the quality of residential and home and community-based long-term care services
and support.

Laws 2014, LB690, § 2.